test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tahtma83_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `tahtma: # Verb (83) `nõstma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tahtma+V+Inf/mA: tahtma
     tahtma+V+Inf: tahtaq
     tahtma+V+ActPrtPrc: tahtnuq
     tahtma+V+PssPrtPrc: [tahet, tahetu]

     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: taha
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [tahat, tahadõq]
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: taht
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: tahamiq
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: tahatiq
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: tahtvaq
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: taha
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [tahtsõ, tahi]
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [tahtsõt, tahtsõq, tahtsõdõq, tahit, tahiq, tahidõq]
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [tahtsõ, tahtʼ]
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [tahtsõmiq, tahimiq]
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [tahtsõtiq, tahitiq]
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: [tahtsõq, tahtsõvaq, tahiq, tahivaq]
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+ConNeg: taha

     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg1: taheda
     tahtma+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3: tahetas

     tahtma+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tahtva

     tahtma+V+Jus: tahtkuq
